Washington statutes.
RCW 36.95.190

Penalty for false statement as to tax exemption.

Any person who shall knowingly make a false statement for exemption from the tax provided under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 155 s 19.]